tables/en-us-g3.ctb
# liblouis: English, U.S. Grade 3 Braille table
#
#  Based on the Linux screenreader BRLTTY, copyright (C) 1999-2006 by
#  The BRLTTY Team
#
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2006 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2006 JJB Software, Inc. www.jjb-software.com
#  Copyright (C) 2022-2025 Dmitriy Lazarev
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

include en-us-g1.ctb

# Braille indicators specific to Grade 3
# =============================================================
# Override: ignore capital sign (dot 6) in Grade 3
# =============================================================

capsletter 9
begcapsword 9-9
endcapsword 9-9

#numbers 10-20
always 10 245
always 11 13
always 12 123
always 13 134
always 14 1345
always 15 135
always 16 1234
always 17 12345
always 18 1235
always 19 234
always 20 2345

#numbers 21-30
always 21 136
always 22 1236
always 23 1346
always 24 13456
always 25 1356
always 26 12346
always 27 123456
always 28 12356
always 29 2346
always 30 23456
always 31 16

#numbers 31-40
always 32 126
always 33 146
always 34 1456
always 35 156
always 36 1246
always 37 12456
always 38 1256
always 39 246
always 40 2456

#numbers 41-50
always 41 2
always 42 23
always 43 25
always 44 256
always 45 26
always 46 235
always 47 2356
always 48 236
always 49 35
always 50 356

#numbers 51-56
always 51 34
always 52 346
always 53 3456
always 54 345
always 55 3
always 56 36

#numbers 57-63
always 57 4
always 58 45
always 59 456
always 60 5
always 61 46
always 62 56
always 63 6

#numbers consisting of 3 digits 010-199
word 010 245-1-245
word 100 1-245-245
word 101 1-245-1
word 102 1-245-12
word 103 1-245-14
word 104 1-245-145
word 105 1-245-15
word 106 1-245-124
word 107 1-245-1245
word 108 1-245-125
word 109 1-245-24
word 110 1-245
word 111 1-13
word 112 1-123
word 113 1-134
word 114 1-1345
word 115 1-135
word 116 1-1234
word 117 1-12345
word 118 1-1235
word 119 1-234
word 120 1-2345
word 121 1-136
word 122 1-1236
word 123 1-1346
word 124 1-13456
word 125 1-1356
word 126 1-12346
word 127 1-123456
word 128 1-12356
word 129 1-2346
word 130 1-23456
word 131 1-16
word 132 1-126
word 133 1-146
word 134 1-1456
word 135 1-156
word 136 1-1246
word 137 1-12456
word 138 1-1256
word 139 1-246
word 140 1-2456
word 141 1-2
word 142 1-23
word 143 1-25
word 144 1-256
word 145 1-26
word 146 1-235
word 147 1-2356
word 148 1-236
word 149 1-35
word 150 1-356
word 151 1-34
word 152 1-346
word 153 1-3456
word 154 1-345
word 155 1-3
word 156 1-36
word 157 1-4
word 158 1-45
word 159 1-456
word 160 1-5
word 161 1-46
word 162 1-56
word 163 1-6
word 164 1-124-145
word 165 1-124-15
word 166 1-124-124
word 167 1-124-1245
word 168 1-124-125
word 169 1-124-24
word 170 1-1245-245
word 171 1-1245-1
word 172 1-1245-12
word 173 1-1245-14
word 174 1-1245-145
word 175 1-1245-15
word 176 1-1245-124
word 177 1-1245-1245
word 178 1-1245-125
word 179 1-1245-24
word 180 1-125-245
word 181 1-125-1
word 182 1-125-12
word 183 1-125-14
word 184 1-125-145
word 185 1-125-15
word 186 1-125-124
word 187 1-125-1245
word 188 1-125-125
word 189 1-125-24
word 190 1-24-245
word 191 1-24-1
word 192 1-24-12
word 193 1-24-14
word 194 1-24-145
word 195 1-24-15
word 196 1-24-124
word 197 1-24-1245
word 198 1-24-125
word 199 1-24-24

#numbers consisting of 3 digits 200-299
word 200 12-245-245
word 201 12-245-1
word 202 12-245-12
word 203 12-245-14
word 204 12-245-145
word 205 12-245-15
word 206 12-245-124
word 207 12-245-1245
word 208 12-245-125
word 209 12-245-24
word 210 12-245
word 211 12-13
word 212 12-123
word 213 12-134
word 214 12-1345
word 215 12-135
word 216 12-1234
word 217 12-12345
word 218 12-1235
word 219 12-234
word 220 12-2345
word 221 12-136
word 222 12-1236
word 223 12-1346
word 224 12-13456
word 225 12-1356
word 226 12-12346
word 227 12-123456
word 228 12-12356
word 229 12-2346
word 230 12-23456
word 231 12-16
word 232 12-126
word 233 12-146
word 234 12-1456
word 235 12-156
word 236 12-1246
word 237 12-12456
word 238 12-1256
word 239 12-246
word 240 12-2456
word 241 12-2
word 242 12-23
word 243 12-25
word 244 12-256
word 245 12-26
word 246 12-235
word 247 12-2356
word 248 12-236
word 249 12-35
word 250 12-356
word 251 12-34
word 252 12-346
word 253 12-3456
word 254 12-345
word 255 12-3
word 256 12-36
word 257 12-4
word 258 12-45
word 259 12-456
word 260 12-5
word 261 12-46
word 262 12-56
word 263 12-6
word 264 12-124-145
word 265 12-124-15
word 266 12-124-124
word 267 12-124-1245
word 268 12-124-125
word 269 12-124-24
word 270 12-1245-245
word 271 12-1245-1
word 272 12-1245-12
word 273 12-1245-14
word 274 12-1245-145
word 275 12-1245-15
word 276 12-1245-124
word 277 12-1245-1245
word 278 12-1245-125
word 279 12-1245-24
word 280 12-125-245
word 281 12-125-1
word 282 12-125-12
word 283 12-125-14
word 284 12-125-145
word 285 12-125-15
word 286 12-125-124
word 287 12-125-1245
word 288 12-125-125
word 289 12-125-24
word 290 12-24-245
word 291 12-24-1
word 292 12-24-12
word 293 12-24-14
word 294 12-24-145
word 295 12-24-15
word 296 12-24-124
word 297 12-24-1245
word 298 12-24-125
word 299 12-24-24

#numbers consisting of 3 digits 300-399
word 300 14-245-245
word 301 14-245-1
word 302 14-245-12
word 303 14-245-14
word 304 14-245-145
word 305 14-245-15
word 306 14-245-124
word 307 14-245-1245
word 308 14-245-125
word 309 14-245-24
word 310 14-245
word 311 14-13
word 312 14-123
word 313 14-134
word 314 14-1345
word 315 14-135
word 316 14-1234
word 317 14-12345
word 318 14-1235
word 319 14-234
word 320 14-2345
word 321 14-136
word 322 14-1236
word 323 14-1346
word 324 14-13456
word 325 14-1356
word 326 14-12346
word 327 14-123456
word 328 14-12356
word 329 14-2346
word 330 14-23456
word 331 14-16
word 332 14-126
word 333 14-146
word 334 14-1456
word 335 14-156
word 336 14-1246
word 337 14-12456
word 338 14-1256
word 339 14-246
word 340 14-2456
word 341 14-2
word 342 14-23
word 343 14-25
word 344 14-256
word 345 14-26
word 346 14-235
word 347 14-2356
word 348 14-236
word 349 14-35
word 350 14-356
word 351 14-34
word 352 14-346
word 353 14-3456
word 354 14-345
word 355 14-3
word 356 14-36
word 357 14-4
word 358 14-45
word 359 14-456
word 360 14-5
word 361 14-46
word 362 14-56
word 363 14-6
word 364 14-124-145
word 365 14-124-15
word 366 14-124-124
word 367 14-124-1245
word 368 14-124-125
word 369 14-124-24
word 370 14-1245-245
word 371 14-1245-1
word 372 14-1245-12
word 373 14-1245-14
word 374 14-1245-145
word 375 14-1245-15
word 376 14-1245-124
word 377 14-1245-1245
word 378 14-1245-125
word 379 14-1245-24
word 380 14-125-245
word 381 14-125-1
word 382 14-125-12
word 383 14-125-14
word 384 14-125-145
word 385 14-125-15
word 386 14-125-124
word 387 14-125-1245
word 388 14-125-125
word 389 14-125-24
word 390 14-24-245
word 391 14-24-1
word 392 14-24-12
word 393 14-24-14
word 394 14-24-145
word 395 14-24-15
word 396 14-24-124
word 397 14-24-1245
word 398 14-24-125
word 399 14-24-24

#numbers consisting of 3 digits 400-499
word 400 145-245-245
word 401 145-245-1
word 402 145-245-12
word 403 145-245-14
word 404 145-245-145
word 405 145-245-15
word 406 145-245-124
word 407 145-245-1245
word 408 145-245-125
word 409 145-245-24
word 410 145-245
word 411 145-13
word 412 145-123
word 413 145-134
word 414 145-1345
word 415 145-135
word 416 145-1234
word 417 145-12345
word 418 145-1235
word 419 145-234
word 420 145-2345
word 421 145-136
word 422 145-1236
word 423 145-1346
word 424 145-13456
word 425 145-1356
word 426 145-12346
word 427 145-123456
word 428 145-12356
word 429 145-2346
word 430 145-23456
word 431 145-16
word 432 145-126
word 433 145-146
word 434 145-1456
word 435 145-156
word 436 145-1246
word 437 145-12456
word 438 145-1256
word 439 145-246
word 440 145-2456
word 441 145-2
word 442 145-23
word 443 145-25
word 444 145-256
word 445 145-26
word 446 145-235
word 447 145-2356
word 448 145-236
word 449 145-35
word 450 145-356
word 451 145-34
word 452 145-346
word 453 145-3456
word 454 145-345
word 455 145-3
word 456 145-36
word 457 145-4
word 458 145-45
word 459 145-456
word 460 145-5
word 461 145-46
word 462 145-56
word 463 145-6
word 464 145-124-145
word 465 145-124-15
word 466 145-124-124
word 467 145-124-1245
word 468 145-124-125
word 469 145-124-24
word 470 145-1245-245
word 471 145-1245-1
word 472 145-1245-12
word 473 145-1245-14
word 474 145-1245-145
word 475 145-1245-15
word 476 145-1245-124
word 477 145-1245-1245
word 478 145-1245-125
word 479 145-1245-24
word 480 145-125-245
word 481 145-125-1
word 482 145-125-12
word 483 145-125-14
word 484 145-125-145
word 485 145-125-15
word 486 145-125-124
word 487 145-125-1245
word 488 145-125-125
word 489 145-125-24
word 490 145-24-245
word 491 145-24-1
word 492 145-24-12
word 493 145-24-14
word 494 145-24-145
word 495 145-24-15
word 496 145-24-124
word 497 145-24-1245
word 498 145-24-125
word 499 145-24-24
